Hawaii statutes.
§668-7 Powers of the court. [(a)] The
court shall have power, subject to section 668-8.5:

(1) To hear, investigate, and determine any and all
questions of conflicting or controverted titles or claims either as to the
whole of the property or as to any share or interest therein, either with or
without the intervention of a jury, as hereinafter provided;

(2) To remove clouds upon the title of the property
or any share or interest therein;

(3) To vest titles by judgments, without the form or
necessity of conveyance by minors or unknown or absent owners;

(4) To cause the property to be equitably divided
between the parties according to their respective proportionate interests
therein, as the parties agree, or by the drawing of lots;

(5) To set apart any particular portion or portions
of land to any particular party or parties who by prior occupation or
improvement or otherwise may be equitably entitled thereto, and make any proper
adjustment or equalization thereof by the sale of other portions and the application
of the proceeds for such purpose, or as a condition of any such particular
allotment to require payment by the parties of any value of the portion set
apart to them in excess of their proportionate interest in the value of the
whole property;

(6) To divide and allot portions of the premises to
some or all of the parties and order a sale of the remainder, or to sell the
whole, where for any reason partition in kind would be impracticable in whole
or in part or be greatly prejudicial to the parties interested, and by judgment
or judgments to invest the purchaser or purchasers with title to any property
sold, and use the proceeds to equalize the general partition; [and]

(7) To exercise any other power pertaining to a
circuit court in a civil action.

[(b)] When partition of two or more separate
tracts or parcels of land is sought, the whole share of any party in all of
them may be set apart to the party in any one or more of the tracts or
parcels. Any plan for a subdivision shall, before approval of the court, be
subject to approval by the planning department of any county having laws and
regulations covering subdivisions, applicable thereto. If action by the
planning department on the proposed subdivision is unreasonably delayed, the
court may order the planning department to appear and show cause why the
subdivision should not be approved by the court. [L 1923, c 178, §7; RL 1925,
§2767; RL 1935, §4746; am L 1939, c 242, §9; RL 1945, §12456; am L 1949, c 222,
§12; RL 1955, §337-7; HRS §668-7; am L 1972, c 90, §11(f) to (j); gen ch 1985]

Cross References

Demand for jury trial when title controverted, see §668-8.

Rules of Court

Enforcement of judgment, see HRCP rule 70.

Case Notes

Improvements made by one of the cotenants considered. 10 H.
662 (1897).

Sale of land, power to order. 37 H. 74 (1945), aff'd 158
F.2d 122 (1946).

Right of allotment of grantee of cotenant where grantee has
made improvements. 48 H. 92, 97, 395 P.2d 620 (1964).

Power of court to order sale of property. 56 H. 171, 532
P.2d 657 (1975).

Allotment of a parcel to a cotenant other than that which the
cotenant occupied and improved upheld. 57 H. 510, 559 P.2d 739 (1977).

Partition of real property in kind upheld. 57 H. 510, 559
P.2d 739 (1977).

Where trial court applied its equitable power in finding that
property should be consolidated and subdivided into two lots, it did not
disregard paragraph (4); this section does not require a trial court to
partition property according to each parties' proportionate interest because a
party so requests. 106 H. 501, 107 P.3d 430 (2005).

A court in equity, in a partition action not involving
ouster or agreement, has the discretionary authority to allow an apportioned
defensive rental offset against maintenance-related and improvement-related
contributions, to the extent that the "reasonable rental value of the use
of the property by the cotenant in possession of property has exceeded his or
her proportionate share of ownership". 123 H. 301 (App.), 234 P.3d 683 (2010).

Cited: 31 H. 817, 819 (1931).

See 34 H. 686 (1938); 35 H. 262 (1939).

Previous
Vol13_Ch0601-0676
Next